Rhode Island, session 2025, SB92.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 31 of the General Laws entitled "MOTOR AND OTHER VEHICLES"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 34.2
RIDESHARE OR TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY VEHICLE SURCHARGE
31-34.2-1. Rideshare or transportation network company vehicle surcharge.
(a) Each rideshare or transportation network company shall collect a surcharge which shall
be added to the fare charged to each customer. For the purposes of this chapter, "rideshare or
transportation network company" means a company that provides on-demand transportation
services through app-based platforms to connect drivers with clients or passengers to facilitate
and/or provide transportation for compensation or a fee.
(b) The surcharge shall be seventy-five cents ($0.75) per fare.
(c) The total amount of surcharge collections shall be remitted to the State of Rhode Island,
and fifty percent (50%) of the surcharge collections shall be deposited in a restricted account to be
used for street infrastructure improvements in the municipality where the fare originated, and fifty
percent (50%) of the surcharge collections shall be deposited in a restricted account to be used as
funding for implementation of Transit Forward RI as adopted by the state planning council.
(d) The tax administrator shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement
the provisions of this chapter.

(e) All disbursements and expenditures of funds from the restricted accounts subject to the
provisions of this section shall be by appropriation of the general assembly.
SECTION 2. Chapter 44-18 of the General Laws entitled "Sales and Use Taxes — Liability
and Computation" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-18-18.2. Transportation network companies tax.
All sales tax revenue collected from transportation network companies, as defined in § 44-
18-7.3, shall be deposited in a restricted receipt account for the benefit of the Rhode Island public
transit authority (RIPTA).
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000172
========
LC000172 - Page 2 of 3